New York, session 2025-2026, S5027.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the state liquor authority is authorized to grant a license credit to 3 any on-premises licensee and any manufacturing licensee with on-premises 4 retail privileges that are licensed pursuant to the alcoholic beverage 5 control law to receive a credit to the next renewal of their license on 6 a pro-rata basis for each inactive day, up to a maximum of three hundred 7 sixty-five days. An inactive day shall mean each day between March 7, 8 2020 and March 7, 2021 that, due to the COVID-19 pandemic or the govern- 9 ment response to the pandemic, the licensee was closed, or ceased all 10 on-premises retail business functions that require a license under the 11 alcoholic beverage control law. The on-premises licensee and any manu- 12 facturing licensee with on-premises retail privileges shall document to 13 the state liquor authority, on a form provided by the authority, the 14 number of inactive days, up to a maximum of three hundred sixty-five 15 days, that they are claiming for a credit to be added to their next 16 retail on-premise license renewal. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 18 deemed repealed January 1, 2028. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01592-01-5